California statutes. Business and Professions Code
A licensee who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that he or she is unable to practice, or assist in the provision of, physical therapy due to a disability may request a waiver of the license renewal fee. The granting of a waiver shall be at the discretion of the board and may be terminated at any time. Waivers shall be based on the inability of a licensee to practice, or assist in the provision of, physical therapy. A licensee whose renewal fee has been waived pursuant to this section shall not engage in the practice of, or assist in the provision of, physical therapy unless and until the licensee pays the current renewal fee and does either of the following:

(a) Establishes to the satisfaction of the board, on a form prescribed by the board and signed under penalty of perjury, that the licensee’s disability either no longer exists or does not affect his or her ability to practice, or assist in the provision of, physical therapy safely.

(b) Signs an agreement, on a form prescribed by the board and signed under penalty of perjury, to limit his or her practice of, or assistance in the provision of, physical therapy in the manner prescribed by his or her reviewing physician.

(c) A person exempt from renewal fees under this section shall not be exempt from meeting the requirements of Section 2649.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 41.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2648.5.

(a) The renewal fee shall be waived for licensees residing in California who certify to the board that license renewal is for the sole purpose of providing voluntary, unpaid physical therapy services. 

(b) A person exempt from renewal fees under this section shall not be exempt from meeting the requirements of Section 2649.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 41.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2649.

(a) A person renewing his or her license shall submit proof satisfactory to the board that, during the preceding two years, he or she has completed the required number of continuing education hours established by regulation by the board, or such other proof of continuing competency as the board may establish by regulation. Required continuing education shall not exceed 30 hours every two years.

(b) The board shall adopt and administer regulations including, but not limited to, continuing education intended to ensure the continuing competency of persons licensed pursuant to this chapter. The board may establish different requirements for physical therapists
 and physical therapist assistants. The board may not require the completion of an additional postsecondary degree or successful completion of an examination as a condition of renewal, but may recognize these as demonstrative of continuing competency. This program shall include provisions requiring random audits of licensees in order to ensure compliance.

(c) The administration of this section may be funded through professional license fees, continuing education provider fees, and recognized approval agency fees. The fees shall not exceed the amounts necessary to cover the actual costs of administering this section.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2676 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 73.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Educational Standards [2650. - 2654.]

2650.

(a) The physical therapist education requirements are as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, each applicant for a license as a physical therapist shall be a graduate of a professional degree program of an accredited postsecondary institution or institutions approved by the board and shall have completed a professional education program including academic course work and clinical internship in physical therapy.

(2) Unless otherwise specified by the board by regulation, the educational requirements shall include instruction in the subjects prescribed by the Commission on Accreditation in Physical Therapy Education (CAPTE) of the American
 Physical Therapy Association or Physiotherapy Education Accreditation Canada and shall include a combination of didactic and clinical experiences. The clinical experience shall include at least 18 weeks of full-time experience with a variety of patients.

(b) The physical therapist assistant educational requirements are as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, each applicant for a license as a physical therapist assistant shall be a graduate of a physical therapist assistant program of an accredited postsecondary institution or institutions approved by the board, and shall have completed both the academic and clinical experience required by the physical therapist assistant program, and have been awarded an associate degree.

(2) Unless otherwise specified by the board by regulation, the educational
 requirements shall include instruction in the subjects prescribed by the CAPTE of the American Physical Therapy Association or Physiotherapy Education Accreditation Canada or another body as may be approved by the board by regulation and shall include a combination of didactic and clinical experiences.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 426, Sec. 20.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2651.

The board shall approve only those physical therapist and physical therapist assistant education programs that prove to the satisfaction of the board that they comply with the minimum physical therapist or physical therapist assistant educational requirements set forth in this chapter and adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter. Physical therapist and physical therapist assistant education programs that are accredited by the Commission on Accreditation in Physical Therapy Education of the American Physical Therapy Association, Physiotherapy Education Accreditation Canada, or such other body as may be approved by the board by regulation shall be deemed approved by the board unless the board determines otherwise. This
 chapter shall not prohibit the board from disapproving any foreign physical therapist or physical therapist assistant educational program or from denying an applicant if, in the opinion of the board, the instruction received by the applicant or the courses offered by the program were not equivalent to that which is required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 47.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2653.

An applicant for a license as a physical therapist who has graduated from a physical therapist education program that is not approved by the board and is not located in the United States shall do all of the following:

(a) Furnish documentary evidence satisfactory to the board, that he or she has completed a professional degree in a physical therapist educational program substantially equivalent at the time of his or her graduation to that issued by a board approved physical therapist education program. The professional degree must entitle the applicant to practice as a physical therapist in the country where the diploma was issued. The applicant shall meet the educational requirements set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2650. The board may require an applicant to
 submit documentation of his or her education to a credentials evaluation service for review and a report to the board.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), demonstrate proficiency in English by achieving a score specified by the board on the Test of English as a Foreign Language administered by the Educational Testing Services or other means as may be specified by the board by regulation.

(2) An applicant shall be exempt from the requirement under paragraph (1) if the applicant has been awarded a bachelor’s degree or higher in a physical therapist educational program from a college, university, or professional training school in Australia, any part of Canada other than Quebec, Ireland, New Zealand, the United Kingdom, the United States, or another English-speaking country specified by the board.

(c) Complete nine months of clinical service in a location approved by the board under the supervision of a physical therapist licensed by a United States jurisdiction, in a manner satisfactory to the board. The applicant shall have passed the written examination required in Section 2636 prior to commencing the period of clinical service. The board shall require the supervising physical therapist to evaluate the applicant and report his or her findings to the board. The board may in its discretion waive all or part of the required clinical service pursuant to guidelines set forth in its regulations. During the period of clinical service, the applicant shall be identified as a physical therapist license applicant. If an applicant fails to complete the required period of clinical service, the board may, for good cause shown, allow the applicant to complete another period of clinical service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 454, Sec. 21.   (AB 1706)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2654.

If an applicant who has graduated from a physical therapist education program that is not approved by the board and is not located in the United States does not qualify to take the physical therapist examination, his or her education may be evaluated by the board and the applicant may be eligible to take the physical therapist assistant examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 51.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Enforcement [2660. - 2661.7.]

2660.

Unprofessional conduct constitutes grounds for citation, discipline, denial of a license, or issuance of a probationary license. The board may, after the conduct of appropriate proceedings under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), issue a citation, impose discipline, deny a license, suspend for not more than 12 months, or revoke, or impose probationary conditions upon any license issued under this chapter for unprofessional conduct that includes, in addition to other provisions of this chapter, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, assisting in or abetting the violation of, or
 conspiring to violate any provision of this chapter, any regulations duly adopted under this chapter, or the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000)).

(b) Advertising in violation of Section 17500.

(c) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license by fraud or misrepresentation.

(d) Practicing or offering to practice beyond the scope of practice of physical therapy.

(e) Conviction of a crime that substantially relates to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant. The record of conviction or a certified copy thereof shall be conclusive evidence of that conviction.

(f) Unlawful possession or use of, or conviction of a
 criminal offense involving, a controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, or any dangerous drug as defined in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4015) of Chapter 9, as follows:

(1) Obtaining or possessing in violation of law, or except as directed by a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, or podiatrist, administering to himself or herself, or furnishing or administering to another, any controlled substance or any dangerous drug.

(2) Using any controlled substance or any dangerous drug.

(3) Conviction of a criminal offense involving the consumption or self-administration of, or the possession of, or falsification of a record pertaining to, any controlled substance or any dangerous drug, in which event the record of the conviction is conclusive
 evidence thereof.

(g) Failure to maintain adequate and accurate records relating to the provision of services to his or her patients.

(h) Gross negligence or repeated acts of negligence in practice or in the delivery of physical therapy care.

(i) Aiding or abetting any person to engage in the unlawful practice of physical therapy.

(j) The commission of any fraudulent, dishonest, or corrupt act that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant.

(k) Except for good cause, the knowing failure to protect patients by failing to follow infection control guidelines of the board, thereby risking transmission of
 bloodborne infectious diseases from licensee to patient, from patient to patient, and from patient to licensee. In administering this subdivision, the board shall consider referencing the standards, regulations, and guidelines of the State Department of Public Health developed pursuant to Section 1250.11 of the Health and Safety Code and the standards, regulations, and guidelines pursuant to the California Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1973 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code) for preventing the transmission of HIV, hepatitis B, and other bloodborne pathogens in health care settings. As necessary, the board shall consult with the Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, the Dental Board of California, the Board of Registered Nursing, and the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California, to encourage appropriate consistency in the implementation of this subdivision.

(l) The commission of verbal abuse or sexual harassment.

(m) Engaging in sexual misconduct or violating Section 726.

(n) Permitting a physical therapist assistant or physical therapy aide under one’s supervision or control to perform, or permitting the physical therapist assistant or physical therapy aide to hold himself or herself out as competent to perform, professional services beyond the level of education, training, and experience of the physical therapist assistant or aide.

(o) The revocation, suspension, or other discipline, restriction, or limitation imposed by another state upon a license or certificate to practice physical therapy issued by that state, or the revocation, suspension, or restriction of the authority to practice physical therapy by
 any agency of the federal government.

(p) Viewing a completely or partially disrobed patient in the course of treatment if the viewing is not necessary to patient evaluation or treatment under current standards.

(q) Engaging in any act in violation of Section 650, 651, or 654.2.

(r) Charging a fee for services not performed.

(s) Misrepresenting documentation of patient care or deliberate falsifying of patient records.

(t) Except as otherwise allowed by law, the employment of runners, cappers, steerers, or other persons to procure patients.

(u) The willful, unauthorized violation of professional confidence.

(v) Failing to maintain confidentiality, except as otherwise required or permitted by law, of all information that has been received from a patient in confidence during the course of treatment and all information about the patient that is obtained from tests or other means.

(w) Habitual intemperance.

(x) Failure to comply with the provisions of Section 2620.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 5.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2660.1.

A patient, client, or customer of a licentiate under this chapter is conclusively presumed to be incapable of giving free, full, and informed consent to any sexual activity which is a violation of Section 726.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1289, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2660.2.

(a) The board may refuse a license to any applicant guilty of unprofessional conduct or sexual activity referred to in Section 2660.1. The board may, in its sole discretion, issue a public letter of reprimand or may issue a probationary license to any applicant for a license who is guilty of unprofessional conduct but who has met all other requirements for licensure. The board may issue the license subject to any terms or conditions not contrary to public policy, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Medical or psychiatric evaluation.

(2) Continuing medical or psychiatric
 treatment.

(3) Restriction of the type or circumstances of practice.

(4) Continuing participation in a board-approved rehabilitation program.

(5) Abstention from the use of alcohol or drugs.

(6) Random fluid testing for alcohol or drugs.

(7) Compliance with laws and regulations governing the practice of physical therapy.

(b) The applicant shall have the right to appeal the denial, or the issuance with terms and conditions, of any license in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein. The action shall be final, except that the propriety of the action is subject to review by the superior court pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) In lieu of refusing a license, the board may, upon stipulation or agreement by the licensee, issue a public letter of reprimand after it has conducted an investigation or inspection as provided for in this chapter. The public letter of reprimand may include a requirement for specified training or education, and cost recovery for investigative costs. The board shall notify the licensee of its intention to issue the letter 30 days before the intended issuance date of the letter. The licensee shall indicate in writing at least 15 days prior to the letter’s intended issuance date whether he or she agrees
 to the issuance of the letter. The board, at its option, may extend the time within which the licensee may respond to its notification. If the licensee does not agree to the issuance of the letter, the board shall not issue the letter and may proceed to file the accusation. The board may use a public letter of reprimand only for minor violations, as defined by the board, committed by the applicant. A public letter of reprimand issued pursuant to this section shall be disclosed by the board to an inquiring member of the public and shall be posted on the board’s Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 55.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2660.3.

In lieu of filing or prosecuting a formal accusation against a licensee, the board may, upon stipulation or agreement by the licensee, issue a public letter of reprimand after it has conducted an investigation or inspection as provided for in this chapter. The public letter of reprimand may include a requirement for specified training or education, and cost recovery for investigative costs. The board shall notify the licensee of its intention to issue the letter 30 days before the intended issuance date of the letter. The licensee shall indicate in writing at least 15 days prior to the letter’s intended issuance date whether he or she agrees to the issuance of the letter. The board, at its option, may extend the time within which the licensee may respond to its notification.
 If the licensee does not agree to the issuance of the letter, the board shall not issue the letter and may proceed to file the accusation. The board may use a public letter of reprimand only for minor violations, as defined by the board, committed by the licensee. A public letter of reprimand issued pursuant to this section shall be disclosed by the board to an inquiring member of the public and shall be posted on the board’s Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 56.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2660.4.

A licensee who fails or refuses to comply with a request from the board for the medical records of a patient, that is accompanied by that patient’s written authorization for release of records to the board, within 15 days of receiving the request and authorization shall pay to the board a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day that the records have not been produced after the 15th day, unless the licensee is unable to provide the records within this time period for good cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 57.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2660.5.

The board shall deny a physical therapist license or physical therapist assistant license to an applicant who is required to register pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code. This section does not apply to an applicant who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code solely because of a misdemeanor conviction under Section 314 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 58.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2660.7.

In addition to the penalties prescribed by Section 123, if the board determines that an applicant for licensure or a licensee has engaged, or has attempted to engage, in conduct that subverts or undermines the integrity of the examination process as described in Section 123, the board may disqualify the applicant from taking the examination or may deny his or her application for licensure or may revoke the license of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 301, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2660.8.

A licensee whose matter has been heard by an administrative law judge of the Medical Quality Hearing Panel as designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code, or whose default has been entered or who has entered into a stipulation for disciplinary action with the board, may, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter: 

(a) Have his or her license revoked upon order of the board. 

(b) Have his or her right to practice suspended for a period not to exceed one year upon order of the board. 

(c) Be placed on probation and required to pay the costs of probation
 monitoring upon order of the board. 

(d) Be publicly reprimanded by the board. 

(e) Be required to surrender his or her license based on an order of the board. 

(f) Have any other action taken in relation to discipline as part of an order of probation, as the board or an administrative law judge may deem proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 59.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2661.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The board may order discipline of the licensee in accordance with Section 2660 or the board may take action as authorized in Section 2660.2 on an application when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing that person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or
 indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 60.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2661.5.

(a) In any order issued in resolution of a disciplinary proceeding before the board, the board may request the administrative law judge to direct any licensee found guilty of unprofessional conduct to pay to the board a sum not to exceed the actual and reasonable costs of the investigation and prosecution of the case.

(b) The costs to be assessed shall be fixed by the administrative law judge and shall not in any event be increased by the board. When the board does not adopt a proposed decision and remands the case to an administrative law judge, the administrative law judge shall not increase the amount of the assessed costs specified in the proposed decision.

(c) When the payment directed in an order for payment of costs is not made by the licensee, the board may enforce the order of payment by bringing an action in any appropriate court. This right of enforcement shall be in addition to any other rights the board may have as to any licensee directed to pay costs.

(d) In any judicial action for the recovery of costs, proof of the board’s decision shall be conclusive proof of the validity of the order of payment and the terms for payment.

(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the board shall not renew or reinstate the license or approval of any person who has failed to pay all of the costs ordered under this section.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the board may, in its discretion, conditionally renew or reinstate for a maximum of one year the license or approval of any person who demonstrates financial hardship and who enters into a formal agreement with the board to reimburse the board within that one year period for those unpaid costs.

(f) All costs recovered under this section shall be deposited in the Physical Therapy Fund as a reimbursement in either the fiscal year in which the costs are actually recovered or the previous fiscal year, as the board may direct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 829, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2661.6.

(a) The board shall establish a probation monitoring program to monitor probationary licenses.

(b) The program may employ nonpeace officer staff to perform its probation monitoring.

(c) The program shall be funded with moneys in the Physical Therapy Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1150, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2661.7.

(a) A person whose license has been revoked or suspended, or who has been placed on probation, may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of penalty, including modification or termination of probation, after a period of not less than the following minimum periods has elapsed from the effective date of the decision ordering that disciplinary action:

(1) At least three years for reinstatement of a license or approval revoked for unprofessional conduct, except that the board may, for good cause shown, specify in a revocation order that a petition for reinstatement may be filed after two years.

(2) At least two years for early termination or one year for modification of a condition of probation of three years or more.

(3) At least one year for reinstatement of a license revoked for mental or physical illness, or for modification of a condition, or termination of probation of less than three years.

(b) The petition shall state any facts as may be required by the board. The petition shall be accompanied by at least two verified recommendations from physical therapists licensed by the board who have personal knowledge of the activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary penalty was imposed.

(c) The petition may be heard by the board. The board may assign the petition to an administrative law judge
 designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code. After a hearing on the petition, the administrative law judge shall provide a proposed decision to the board that shall be acted upon in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(d) The board or the administrative law judge hearing the petition may consider all activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary action was taken, the offense for which the petitioner was disciplined, the petitioner’s activities during the time the license was in good standing, and the petitioner’s rehabilitative efforts, general reputation for truth, and professional ability. The hearing may be continued, as the board or the administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code finds necessary.

(e) The
 administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code when hearing a petition for reinstating a license, or modifying a penalty, may recommend the imposition of any terms and conditions deemed necessary.

(f) No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole. No petition shall be considered while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the petitioner. The board may deny, without a hearing or argument, any petition filed pursuant to this section within a period of two years from the effective date of the prior decision following a hearing under this section.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be deemed
 to alter Sections 822 and 823.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 61.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Substance Abuse Rehabilitation Program [2662. - 2669.]

2662.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the board shall seek ways and means to identify and rehabilitate physical therapists and physical therapist assistants whose competency is impaired due to abuse of dangerous drugs or alcohol so that they may be treated and returned to the practice of physical therapy in a manner which will not endanger the public health and safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 829, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2663.

The board shall establish and administer a substance abuse rehabilitation program, hereafter referred to as the rehabilitation program, for the rehabilitation of physical therapists and physical therapist assistants whose competency is impaired due to the abuse of drugs or alcohol. The board may contract with any other state agency or a private organization to perform its duties under this article. The board may establish one or more rehabilitation evaluation committees to assist it in carrying out its duties under this article. Any rehabilitation evaluation committee established by the board shall operate under the direction of the rehabilitation program manager, as designated by the executive officer of the board. The program
 manager has the primary responsibility to review and evaluate recommendations of the committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 63.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2664.

(a) Any rehabilitation evaluation committee established by the board shall have at least three members. In making appointments to a rehabilitation evaluation committee, the board shall consider the appointment of persons who are either recovering from substance abuse and have been free from substance abuse for at least three years immediately prior to their appointment or who are knowledgeable in the treatment and recovery of substance abuse. The board also shall consider the appointment of a physician and surgeon who is board certified in psychiatry.

(b) Appointments to a rehabilitation evaluation committee shall be by the affirmative vote of a
 majority of members appointed to the board. Each appointment shall be at the pleasure of the board for a term not to exceed four years. In its discretion, the board may stagger the terms of the initial members so appointed.

(c) A majority of the members of a rehabilitation evaluation committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. Any action requires an affirmative vote of a majority of those members present at a meeting constituting at least a quorum. Each rehabilitation evaluation committee shall elect from its membership a chairperson and a vice chairperson. Notwithstanding the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), relating to public meetings, a rehabilitation evaluation committee may convene in closed
 session to consider matters relating to any physical therapist or physical therapist assistant applying for or participating in a rehabilitation program, and a meeting which will be convened entirely in closed session need not comply with Section 11125 of the Government Code. A rehabilitation evaluation committee shall only convene in closed session to the extent it is necessary to protect the privacy of an applicant or participant. Each member of a rehabilitation evaluation committee shall receive a per diem and shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 64.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2665.

Each rehabilitation evaluation committee has the following duties and responsibilities:

(a) To evaluate physical therapists and physical therapist assistants who request participation in the rehabilitation program and to make recommendations. In making recommendations, the committee shall consider any recommendations from professional consultants on the admission of applicants to the rehabilitation program.

(b) To review and designate treatment facilities to which physical therapists and physical therapist assistants in the rehabilitation program may be referred.

(c) To receive and review information concerning physical therapists and physical therapist assistants participating in the program.

(d) Calling meetings as necessary to consider the requests of physical therapists and physical therapist assistants to participate in the rehabilitation program, to consider reports regarding participants in the program, and to consider any other matters referred to it by the board.

(e) To consider whether each participant in the rehabilitation program may with safety continue or resume the practice of physical therapy.

(f) To set forth in writing the terms and conditions of the
 rehabilitation agreement that is approved by the program manager for each physical therapist and physical therapist assistant participating in the program, including treatment, supervision, and monitoring requirements.

(g) To hold a general meeting at least twice a year, which shall be open and public, to evaluate the rehabilitation program’s progress, to prepare reports to be submitted to the board, and to suggest proposals for changes in the rehabilitation program.

(h) For the purposes of Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, any member of a rehabilitation evaluation committee shall be considered a public employee. No board or rehabilitation evaluation committee member, contractor, or agent thereof, shall be liable for any civil
 damage because of acts or omissions which may occur while acting in good faith in a program established pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 65.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2666.

(a) Criteria for acceptance into the rehabilitation program shall include all of the following:

(1) The applicant shall be licensed as a physical therapist or as a physical therapist assistant by the board and shall be a resident of California.

(2) The applicant shall be found to abuse dangerous drugs or alcoholic beverages in a manner that may affect his or her ability to practice physical therapy safely or competently.

(3) The applicant shall have voluntarily requested admission to the program or shall be accepted into the
 program in accordance with terms and conditions resulting from a disciplinary action.

(4) The applicant shall agree to undertake any medical or psychiatric examination ordered to evaluate the applicant for participation in the program.

(5) The applicant shall cooperate with the program by providing medical information, disclosure authorizations, and releases of liability as may be necessary for participation in the program.

(6) The applicant shall agree in writing to cooperate with all elements of the treatment program designed for him or her.

Any applicant may be denied participation in the program if the board, the program manager, or a rehabilitation evaluation committee
 determines that the applicant will not substantially benefit from participation in the program or that the applicant’s participation in the program creates too great a risk to the public health, safety, or welfare.

(b) A participant may be terminated from the program for any of the following reasons:

(1) The participant has successfully completed the treatment program.

(2) The participant has failed to comply with the treatment program designated for him or her.

(3) The participant fails to meet any of the criteria set forth in subdivision (a) or (c).

(4) It is determined that the participant has
 not substantially benefited from participation in the program or that his or her continued participation in the program creates too great a risk to the public health, safety, or welfare. Whenever an applicant is denied participation in the program or a participant is terminated from the program for any reason other than the successful completion of the program, and it is determined that the continued practice of physical therapy by that individual creates too great a risk to the public health, safety, and welfare, that fact shall be reported to the executive officer of the board and all documents and information pertaining to and supporting that conclusion shall be provided to the executive officer. The matter may be referred for investigation and disciplinary action by the board. Each physical therapist or physical therapy assistant who requests participation in a rehabilitation program shall
 agree to cooperate with the recovery program designed for him or her. Any failure to comply with that program may result in termination of participation in the program.

The rehabilitation evaluation committee shall inform each participant in the program of the procedures followed in the program, of the rights and responsibilities of a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant in the program, and the possible results of noncompliance with the program.

(c) In addition to the criteria and causes set forth in subdivision (a), the board may set forth in its regulations additional criteria for admission to the program or causes for termination from the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 66.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2667.

All board and rehabilitation evaluation committee records and records of proceedings and participation of a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant in a program shall be confidential and are not subject to discovery or subpoena.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 67.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2668.

(a) A fee to cover the actual cost of administering the program shall be charged for participation in the program. If the board contracts with any other entity to carry out this article, at the discretion of the board, the fee may be collected and retained by that entity.
